Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2318
Act, how cited.

Sections 21-2301 to 21-2318 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Industrial Development Corporation Act.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 19.